Louisiana, session 2026, HB733.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:414(I)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:414(X)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§414. Suspension, revocation, renewal, and cancellation of licenses; judicial review
* * *
I.(1) The reinstatement fee for a license of a person who has been convicted
of or forfeited bond on or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge of
operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of beverages of high alcoholic
content, of low alcoholic content, of narcotic drugs, or of central nervous system
stimulants shall be one hundred fifty dollars if one conviction appears listed on his
record prior to application for reinstatement; two hundred fifty dollars if two such
convictions appear on his record prior to application for reinstatement; and three
hundred fifty dollars for each conviction on his record after the second conviction
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1300 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 733
prior to application for reinstatement, and the requirements of R.S. 32:896 relative
to proof of financial responsibility have been satisfied.
* * *
X. For an initial adjustment of fees, the office of motor vehicles shall
determine the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, or CPI-U, for the period beginning August 1, 2026, and ending January
31, 2028. Beginning July 1, 2028, the office of motor vehicles shall make an annual
adjustment increasing all the fees contained in this Section by a percentage not to
exceed the annual increase in the CPI-U in the preceding year.